California statutes. Financial Code
 purposes as though the same had been executed by the officers of the licensee by authority of its board of directors. Whenever the commissioner sells any real property of the licensee a certified copy of the order of the court approving the sale shall be recorded in the county in which any part of the real property is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

675.

The commissioner, in the name of the delinquent licensee or in his or her own name, may prosecute and defend any and all actions and other legal proceedings appropriate or necessary to the liquidation of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

676.

The commissioner from time to time shall deposit all moneys coming into his or her hands in the course of the liquidation of the licensee in one or more state banks or state credit unions and in the event of the suspension or insolvency of the depositary shall be preferred before all other deposits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

677.

The commissioner shall make an inventory of the assets of the licensee in duplicate and file one in the office of the commissioner and one with the clerk of the county in which the head office of the licensee is located to be filed with the papers in the liquidation proceedings. The inventory shall be open for inspection at all reasonable times.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

678.

When the time fixed for the presentation of claims has expired, the commissioner shall make in duplicate a full and complete list of all claims presented, including and specifying claims that have been rejected by the commissioner, and a list of all claims of customers as shown by the books or records of the licensee for which claims have not yet been presented, and shall file one copy of the list in the commissioner’s office and one with the clerk of the county in which the head office
 of the licensee is located to be filed with the papers in the liquidation proceedings. Before each application to the court for leave to declare a dividend, the commissioner shall file a supplemental list of claims presented since the last preceding list was filed, including and specifying any claims that have been rejected by him or her. The list of claims and of claims of customers as shown by the books or records of the licensee shall be open for inspection at all reasonable times.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

679.

The commissioner shall cause notice to be given by advertisement in any newspapers of general circulation as he or she may select weekly for three consecutive months, calling on all persons who have claims against the licensee to present the same to the commissioner and make legal proof thereof at a place to be specified therein and within four months of the date of the first publication of the notice, which date shall be specified in the notice. The notice shall also state that all
 claims other than those of customers appearing upon the books or records of the licensee shall be forever barred if not filed within the four months’ period and that all claims of customers appearing upon the books or records of the licensee will be forever barred, except as herein provided, if not filed prior to the filing of a petition for a final dividend. The commissioner shall also mail a similar notice to all persons, including customers whose names appear as creditors upon the books of the licensee and whose addresses appear upon the books or records of the licensee, and shall enclose therewith a printed form of notice of claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

680.

All claims of every kind against the licensee or against any property owned or held by the licensee shall be presented to the commissioner in writing verified by the claimant or someone on his or her behalf within four months of the date of the first publication of the notice to creditors. Any claim, other than the claim of a customer whose claim appears upon the books or records of the licensee, not presented within the four months’ period shall be forever barred and any claim of a
 customer whose claim appears upon the books or records of the licensee that is not so presented prior to the date of the filing of the petition of the commissioner with the court for approval of the payment of the final dividend shall be forever barred except as to any moneys remaining after all debts for which claims were duly filed have been paid in full with interest. If the commissioner doubts the validity of any claim, he or she may reject the claim and serve notice of the rejection upon the claimant either by mail or personally. An affidavit of the mailing or personal service of the notice shall be prima facie evidence of the receipt thereof and shall be filed with the commissioner. Any action upon a rejected claim shall be brought within three months after the date of mailing or personal service of the notice of rejection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

681.

At any time and from time to time after the expiration of the time fixed for the presentation of claims, the commissioner, after obtaining approval of the court, may declare and pay one or more dividends upon all approved claims out of the funds remaining in his or her hands after the payment of expenses and after setting aside an amount sufficient to pay to all customers, who have not yet filed claims but whose claims appear upon the books or records of the licensee, their pro rata share
 of the funds then available for the payment of a dividend. At any time after the expiration of one year from the date of the first publication of notice to creditors and after obtaining the approval of the court, the commissioner may declare and pay a final dividend.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

682.

(a) Expenses and claims of unsecured creditors have priority in the following order:

(1) Expenses of liquidation and approved claims for fees and assessments due the department.

(2) Approved claims given priority under other provisions of state or federal law, including, but not limited to, Sections 676 and 710.

(3) Approved claims for “deposits,” as that term is defined in 12 U.S.C. Section 1813(l), but including obligations of the type described in 12 U.S.C. Section 1813(l)(5)(A) and (B).

(4) Approved claims for other general liabilities.

(5) Approved claims for obligations subordinated to deposits and other general liabilities.

(b) Interest shall be given the same priority as the claim on which it is based, but no interest shall be paid on any claim until the principal of all claims within the same class has been paid or adequately provided for in full.

(c) Any funds remaining shall be paid to the members or shareholders, as appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

683.

Objections to any claim not rejected by the commissioner may be made by any person interested by filing a copy of the objection with the commissioner, who shall present the copy to the court at the time of the next application for approval of the declaration of a dividend. The court shall thereupon dispose of the objections or may order a reference for that purpose, and should the objections to any claim be sustained by the court or by the referee, the claim shall not be allowed by the
 commissioner until the claimant has established the claim by judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

684.

Dividends remaining unpaid and any sums available for payment of shares or deposits for which no claim was filed, which remain in the hands of the commissioner six months after the order for the payment of a final dividend, shall be deposited in the State Treasury. The shares or deposits shall be deemed to have been received under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and shall be subject to claim or other disposition as provided in
 that chapter. The commissioner may pay over the moneys held by him or her to the persons respectively entitled thereto at any time prior to depositing the shares or deposits in the State Treasury, upon being furnished satisfactory evidence of the persons’ right to the same.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

685.

Whenever, under the provisions of this article, the commissioner is required to transmit unclaimed money or other unclaimed property to any state officer for deposit in the State Treasury, the commissioner, upon request of the Controller, shall transmit to the Controller all signature cards and any other identifying information available from the records of the licensee, covering the money or other property. Upon receipt by the Controller of the signature cards or other identifying
 information, the licensee and the commissioner shall be relieved of all responsibility therefor. The signature cards and other identifying information may be destroyed or otherwise disposed of by the Controller whenever, in his or her discretion, their further retention by him or her is no longer required in the interest of the customers or the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

686.

All approved claims of customers and other creditors shall bear interest at the rate provided by law on judgments from the date that the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

687.

If the licensee has in its possession for safekeeping or storage any jewelry, plate, money, specie, bullion, stocks, bonds, securities, valuable papers, or other valuable personal property, or has rented any vaults, safes, or safe-deposit boxes, the commissioner shall cause to be mailed, by registered mail, postage prepaid, to any known person claiming to be or appearing on the books of the licensee to be the owner of the property or to the person in whose name the safe, vault, or box
 stands a notice notifying the person to remove all of the personal property within a specified fixed period of not less than 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

688.

On the last day fixed in the notice for the removal of the property or on the date when the property is removed or the box surrendered, any contract between the person owning the property or holding the box and the licensee shall cease and the amount of the unearned prepaid rent or charges, if any, shall become a debt of the licensee to the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

689.

If any property is not removed within the time fixed by the notice mailed by the commissioner, the commissioner may dispose of the property as the court, on application thereto, shall direct. The commissioner may cause any safe, vault, or box to be opened in his or her presence or in the presence of one of the special deputy commissioners and of a notary not an officer or employee of the licensee or of the commissioner. The contents thereof, if any, shall be sealed by the notary in a
 package upon which the notary shall distinctly mark the name and address of the person in whose name the safe or box stands upon the books of the licensee and shall attach thereon a list and a description of the property within the package. The package so sealed and addressed, together with the list and description may be kept by the commissioner in one or more of the safes or boxes of the licensee or elsewhere until delivered to the person whose name it bears or until otherwise disposed of as directed by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

690.

(a) When the commissioner has completed the liquidation of the licensee, he or she shall petition the court for an order declaring the licensee duly wound up and dissolved.

(b) After any notice as the court may direct and a hearing, the court may make an order declaring the licensee duly wound up and dissolved. The order shall declare all of the following:

(1) The licensee has been duly wound up.

(2) A final franchise tax return, if any, as described by Section 23332 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, has been filed with the Franchise Tax Board as required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and any tax or penalty due under the Corporation Tax Law has been paid, and the licensee’s known debts and liabilities have been paid or adequately provided for, or any taxes, penalties, debts, and liabilities have been paid so far as the licensee’s assets permitted, as the case may be. If there are known debts or liabilities for the payment of which adequate provision has been made, the order shall describe the provision, setting forth any information necessary to enable the creditor or other person to whom payment is to be made to appear and claim payment of the debt or liability.

(3) All known assets of the licensee have been distributed to its shareholders or wholly applied on account of the licensee’s debts and liabilities.

(4) The licensee is dissolved.

(c) The court may make additional orders and grant further relief as it deems proper upon the evidence submitted.

(d) Upon the making of the order declaring the licensee dissolved, the corporate existence of the licensee shall cease, except for the purposes of any necessary further winding up.

(e) Upon the making of the order declaring the licensee dissolved, the commissioner shall file with the Secretary of State a copy of the order, certified by the clerk of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

691.

Whenever this article requires court approval of any step in the liquidation proceedings, approval shall be given after a hearing upon notice as the court may direct. At the hearing, the court may by order approve the actions of the commissioner for which he or she has petitioned the court’s approval or it may, by appropriate order, otherwise direct the commissioner in the matter in connection with which the petition was filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

692.

Whenever, in the opinion of the commissioner, the liquidation or reorganization of any licensee taken in charge by him or her would be facilitated, or the public interests and the interests of customers or stockholders would be served, the commissioner may borrow money on behalf of the licensee from any federal agency authorized to lend money to receivers, trustees, liquidating agents, or other agents or supervisory authorities in charge of licensees that are closed or in process of
 liquidation and, with approval of the court, the commissioner may secure any borrowings by the pledge of the assets of the licensee in any manner and amount the commissioner deems necessary, proper, or expedient.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Disposal of Unclaimed Trust Property [700. - 702.]

700.

Whenever any licensee is being liquidated or whenever the trust business of any licensee has been discontinued and the licensee has in its possession money or other property held by it in trust or for safekeeping and the beneficiaries or persons entitled thereto are unknown or cannot be found, the commissioner or the licensee, upon obtaining approval of the superior court of the county in which the liquidation proceedings are pending or in which the head office of the licensee is
 situated, may do the following:

(a) In the case of money, deliver it to the Treasurer.

(b) In the case of other property, deliver it to the Controller for deposit in the State Treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

701.

Upon the delivery of any money to the Treasurer or upon the delivery of any property to the Controller, a certified copy of the order of the court approving the delivery shall be given to the Controller, and upon the delivery of any money to the Treasurer a notice giving the amount delivered shall be filed with the Controller. Upon the receipt of any money or other properties, the Treasurer or the Controller, as the case may be, shall issue a receipt for the same and the receipt shall be
 deemed a voucher in favor of the licensee to the same extent as though executed by the beneficiary or other person entitled thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

702.

All money or other property delivered to the Treasurer or Controller pursuant to this article shall be deemed to be delivered for deposit in the State Treasury under the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure and shall be subject to claim or other disposition as provided in that chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Priorities [710. - 710.]

710.

The holder or transferor of a negotiable instrument transferred to a licensee for collection has a preferred claim in the amount of the liability of the licensee on the instrument if the instrument was forwarded to the licensee by any person or by any other financial institution for collection and remittance, if payment therefor has not been made and if the same has been collected either in whole or in part by the licensee, unless the holder or transferor is a voluntary depositor in the
 licensee and the proceeds of the collection, at his or her request, have been credited by the licensee to his or her account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Voluntary Liquidation [720. - 721.]

720.

Any licensee that voluntarily has ceased to do the business for which it is licensed shall immediately notify the commissioner and proceed to liquidate its affairs. Any share or deposit or other sum that has not been paid to the person entitled thereto within six months after the licensee ceased to conduct a business shall be paid into the State Treasury. The deposits with the State Treasury shall be deemed to have been received under the provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section
 1500) of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure and shall be subject to claim or other disposition as provided in that chapter. If the commissioner has reason to conclude that the liquidation of the licensee is not being safely or expeditiously conducted, he or she may take possession of the business and property of the licensee in the same manner and with the same effect and subject to the same rights accorded the licensee as if he or she had taken possession pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 600), and he or she may proceed to liquidate the licensee’s affairs in the same manner as provided in that article. When the licensee has been completely liquidated, its corporate existence shall be dissolved in the manner provided by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

721.

If the licensee referred to in Section 720 is a state-chartered credit union and the commissioner has taken possession of the business and property of the credit union, the commissioner may appoint a liquidating agent or a liquidating committee of three members of the credit union to liquidate the business and assets of the credit union in the manner provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 15250) of Chapter 9 of Division 5, except that, in lieu of the certificate required under
 Section 15252, the commissioner shall prepare and file in the office of the Secretary of State a certificate of commencement of liquidation proceedings upon taking possession of the business and assets, and the commissioner or his or her authorized deputy shall countersign the certificate referred to in Sections 15257 and 15258 whenever liquidation is involuntary. The commissioner may, however, prepare and file a final certificate whenever he or she retains possession of the assets of any credit union for the purpose of liquidation. The liquidating agent need not be a member of the credit union to be liquidated and may be a person, firm, or corporation, as determined by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Approval of Names of Nonbank Corporations [730. - 734.]

730.

In this chapter:

(a) “Nonbank corporation” means any corporation incorporated or proposed to be incorporated under the laws of this state, other than (1) any bank or (2) any corporation incorporated or proposed to be incorporated under the laws of this state for the purpose of transacting business under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1850) of Chapter 21 of Division 1.1.

(b) “Subject name,” means a name of a nonbank corporation which, as set forth, or as proposed to be set forth, in the articles of such nonbank corporation, includes “bank,” “trust,” “trustee,” or related words.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

731.

An application for a certificate of approval of the subject name of a nonbank corporation shall be in such form, shall contain such information, shall be signed in such manner, and shall (if the commissioner so requires by regulation or order) be verified in such manner, as the commissioner may by regulation or order require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

732.

The fee for filing with the commissioner an application for a certificate of approval of the subject name of a nonbank corporation shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

733.

If the commissioner finds, with respect to an application for a certificate of approval of the subject name of a nonbank corporation, that the subject name does not indicate that the nonbank corporation is engaged in the banking, industrial banking, or trust business, the commissioner shall issue a certificate of approval of the subject name. If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

734.

Promptly after the articles of a nonbank corporation, with the certificate of approval of the subject name of such nonbank corporation attached thereto, are filed with the Secretary of State, such nonbank corporation shall file with the commissioner a copy of such articles certified by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Legal Investments for Nonbank Licensees [800. - 819.]

800.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Net direct debt” of any public corporation means all indebtedness of every kind after deducting from the indebtedness sinking funds available for the payment thereof, any indebtedness evidenced by tax anticipation notes for the payment of which nondelinquent taxes are pledged, obligations payable only from
 special assessments, revenue obligations payable only from special revenues pledged for their payment, and such proportion of any indebtedness issued for revenue producing works, properties, or utilities that have been in operation for at least one year as the amount of the annual net revenue therefrom bears to the amount of the annual debt service requirements of those bonds.

(b) “Net overlapping debt” of any public corporation means the proportion of the net direct debt as above defined of any other public corporation (herein called overlapping corporation) that lies wholly or partially within the boundaries of the public corporation as the assessed valuation of the taxable property of the overlapping public corporation lying within the boundaries of the public corporation as shown by the last official equalized county assessment roll bears to the assessed valuation of all taxable property of the overlapping public corporation as shown by the
 last official equalized county assessment roll.

(c) “Funded debt,” as used in this chapter, means all interest-bearing indebtedness of a corporation not maturing within one year of the date the indebtedness was incurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

801.

Any securities or other assets that are described in Sections 803 to 819, inclusive, are legal investments for savings banks.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

802.

Where any laws of this state provide that the moneys of any pension fund, retirement plan, trust fund, or the moneys of any special fund the investment of which is governed by law, or the funds of any political subdivision or public corporation may or shall be invested in securities which are a legal investment for savings banks, that law shall be deemed to authorize or require, as the case may be, that those moneys be invested in securities in which savings banks were authorized to invest
 their funds by the provisions of the Bank Act as it read prior to January 1, 1949, other than paragraph (f) of subdivision 5 of Section 61 of that act, or in bonds, debentures, and notes legal for investments for savings banks in the State of New York or the State of Massachusetts as of the time the investment is made or in securities in which commercial banks are authorized to invest their funds by the provisions of Sections 803 to 819, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

803.

Gold and silver bullion and United States mint certificates of ascertained value.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

804.

Stock of a federal reserve bank or of a federal home loan bank to the extent authorized by Section 1325.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

805.

Bonds or other interest-bearing notes and obligations of the United States and those for which the faith and credit of the United States are pledged for the payment of principal and interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

806.

Bonds of the State of California and those for which the faith and credit of the State of California are pledged for the payment of principal and interest and in registered warrants of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

807.

Bonds of any flood control and water conservation districts, or any zone thereof, having an assessed valuation on taxable real property of not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), county, city and county, city, metropolitan water district, municipal utility district, special districts established by and within any municipal utility district, transit district, rapid transit district including sales tax revenue bonds of the district, metropolitan transit authority, flood control
 district, or school district of the State of California (herein referred to generally as public corporation) except the bonds of any particular such public corporation which may be declared ineligible for investment by savings banks by regulations of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

808.

Bonds of any other political subdivision, public corporation, or district of the State of California (herein referred to generally as public corporations) having the power, without limit as to rate or amount; to levy taxes to pay the principal and interest of the bonds upon all property within its boundaries subject to taxation by such public corporation, provided the net direct debt of such public corporation together with its net overlapping debt does not exceed 25 percent of the assessed
 valuation of the taxable property within its boundaries according to the last official equalized county assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

809.

(a) Any of the following subject to the conditions set forth in subdivision (b) to (d), inclusive.

(1) Bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of, or which are unconditionally guaranteed by the Dominion of Canada, the State of Israel, the United States of Mexico, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any state of the United States other than California, for the payment of both principal and interest of
 which in United States dollars, the faith and credit of the entity is pledged.

(2) Limited obligations of any state of the United States, other than California, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, payable only from special taxes that are pledged to the payment of principal and interest of the limited obligations.

(3) Bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of any city, county, political subdivision, public corporation, or district (herein referred to generally as public corporations) of any state of the United States, other than California, or of the Dominion of Canada, or of the State of Israel, or of the United States of Mexico or of the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, having the power without limit as to rate or amount to levy taxes to pay the principal and interest of the bonds upon all property within its boundaries subject to taxation by the public corporation.

(b) In the case of bonds constituting general obligations of any such state, commonwealth, dominion, or country, such state, commonwealth, dominion, or country has not within 10 years prior to the investment defaulted for a period of more than 90 days in the payment of any part of either principal or interest of any of its debts.

(c) In the case of limited obligations of any state, or commonwealth, all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The state or commonwealth has not, within 10 years prior to the date of the investment, defaulted for a period of more than 90 days in the payment of either principal or interest of any of its debts.

(2) The special taxes pledged for the payment of the limited obligations shall have been collected for five years and
 shall have averaged at least one and one-half times the debt service requirements, including those for principal, interest, and sinking fund, on all special obligations existing at the time.

(3) The special taxes for each of the five fiscal years shall have equaled at least the amount of all the debt service requirements on the special obligations.

(d) In the case of bonds or other evidences of indebtedness of any public corporation of any state other than California, or of any commonwealth, all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The public corporation has had a corporate existence or been otherwise established and functioning for at least 10 years prior to the time of the investment.

(2) The public corporation has a population of at least 50,000
 inhabitants according to the last federal or state census.

(3) The public corporation for a period of at least 10 years prior to the investment has not defaulted in the payment of any part of the principal or interest of any of its debts for a period of more than 90 days.

(4) The net direct debt together with the net overlapping debt of the public corporation does not exceed 10 percent of the assessed valuation of the property subject to taxation by the public corporation according to the last official equalized assessment roll or list upon the basis of which taxes for debt service are based.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

810.

Bonds of any irrigation district, water storage district, water conservation district, county water district, reclamation district, drainage district, and any district the primary function of which is the irrigation, reclamation or drainage of land within its boundaries, located in California, other than bonds referred to in Section 807, provided either of the following conditions are met:

(a) The bonds qualify under Section
 808.

(b) The bonds have been certified as legal securities for savings banks pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 10 of the Water Code and the certification remains unrevoked and the total outstanding bonded indebtedness of the district including bonds authorized but not issued, but excluding bonds payable solely from revenues and not directly or indirectly from assessments, does not exceed 50 percent of the aggregate of the assessed value of the lands, exclusive of improvements, subject to assessment by the district, and the value of the property owned by the district or to be acquired or constructed with the proceeds of the bonds under consideration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

811.

(a) Bonds, consolidated bonds, collateral trust debentures, consolidated debentures, or other obligations issued by federal land banks or federal intermediate credit banks established under the Federal Farm Loan Act, as amended, and the Farm Credit Act of 1971.

(b) Debentures and consolidated debentures issued by the Central Bank for Cooperatives and banks for cooperatives established under the Farm
 Credit Act of 1933, as amended, and the Farm Credit Act of 1971.

(c) Bonds or debentures of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board established under the Federal Home Loan Bank Act.

(d) Bonds of any federal home loan bank established under the Federal Home Loan Bank Act.

(e) Stocks, bonds, debentures, participations and other obligations of or issued by the Federal National Mortgage Association, the Student Loan Marketing Association, the Government National Mortgage Association and the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

812.

Bonds, notes or other obligations issued by the Federal Financing Bank, the United States Postal Service, or issued or assumed by the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development, the Tennessee Valley Authority, the Inter-American Development Bank, the Government Development Bank for Puerto Rico, the Asian Development Bank, the International Finance Corporation, or the African Development Bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

813.

(a) Notes with a maturity not exceeding 15 months after the date of issue, issued in anticipation of uncollected taxes, income, revenue, cash receipts, and other moneys of the State of California or any city, county, city and county, or school district thereof; provided the notes and warrants and the interest thereon shall be a first lien and charge against, and shall be payable from, the first moneys received by the local agency from such pledged moneys; provided the
 total amount of the notes issued at any one time or during any specified period does not exceed 85 percent of the receipts or revenues.

(b) Grant anticipation notes issued by the agencies and payable not later than 36 months after the date of issue, provided that the total amount of the notes and interest payable thereon issued at any one time or during any specified period does not exceed 80 percent of the grant funds stated in writing by the granting authority as committed or appropriated, and shall be paid on a specified date or dates within a 36-month period from the dating of the notes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

814.

Revenue securities of any state of the United States, or of the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and of any city, county, city and county, political subdivision, public corporation, or district (herein referred to generally as public corporations) of any state or commonwealth and of any department, board, agency, or authority of any state or commonwealth or of any public corporation, if the following conditions are met:

(a) The
 revenue securities constitute obligations payable out of the revenues from a revenue-producing property owned, controlled, or operated by a state, commonwealth, public corporation, or by a department, board, agency, or authority thereof and are secured by the revenues.

(b) Either of the following paragraphs apply:

(1) (A) The net income from the property available for the payment of the securities for the five fiscal years next preceding any such investment, shall have averaged at least one and one-tenth times all debt service requirements for principal, interest, and sinking fund of all revenue securities payable only out of the revenues from that property during each of those fiscal years, and for each of the five fiscal years shall have equaled at least all debt service requirements for principal, interest, and sinking fund of the securities, and for the